Idaho, session 2026, S1405.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Agriculture for the Soil and Wa-
ter Conservation Commission is hereby reduced by the following amounts from
the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $1,517,000 $212,800 $1,805,200 $3,535,000
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 30,000 30,000
Resource Conservation and Rangeland Development
Fund 221,000 166,500 $200 387,700
Clean Water Revolving Loan (SCC)
Fund 0 30,000 0 0 30,000
TOTAL $1,738,000 $439,300 $200 $1,805,200 $3,982,700
SECTION 2. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Water Resources for the
Soil and Water Conservation Commission the following amounts to be expended
according to the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the
period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $1,517,000 $212,800 $2,105,200 $3,835,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 20,000 67,100 87,100
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 30,000 30,000
Resource Conservation and Rangeland Development
Fund 221,000 166,500 $200 387,700
Clean Water Revolving Loan (SCC)
Fund 0 30,000 0 0 30,000
TOTAL $1,738,000 $459,300 $200 $2,172,300 $4,369,800
SECTION 3. TRUSTEE AND BENEFIT PAYMENTS DISTRIBUTION. Of the amount ap-
propriated to the Department of Water Resources for the Soil and Water Con-
servation Commission in Section 2 of this act for trustee and benefit pay-
ments, $300,000 shall be distributed equally among the 50 soil and water con-
servation districts in addition to the amounts authorized pursuant to Sec-
tion 22-2727, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 5. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 3, Chap-
ter 136, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Department of Agriculture for the Soil and Wa-
ter Conservation Commission $12,900 from the Miscellaneous Revenue Fund to
be expended for trustee and benefit payments for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026, to support the Conservation Reserve Enhancement Pro-
gram.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 5 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 4 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.